Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1371.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 458 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:Section 458. Enrollment Limitation.--[Upon] (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), upon enrollment in a managed care plan, an eligible person who retains eligibility shall maintain enrollment in the managed care plan for not less than twelve months unless a waiver is granted by the department.(b) An eligible person may change managed care plans:(1) without cause during the ninety-day period following the later of:(i) the date of the eligible person's initial enrollment; or(ii) the date that the department sends the eligible person notice of enrollment;12345678910111213141516171819 (2) without cause during an annual enrollment opportunity, for which the department shall provide notice at least sixty days in advance; or(3) for good cause at any time.(c) Good cause under subsection (b)(3) shall be limited to the following causes for disenrollment:(1) The enrollee moves out of the service area.(2) The plan does not, because of moral or religious objections, cover the service that the enrollee seeks.(3) The enrollee needs related services to be performed at the same time, not all related services are available within the provider network and the enrollee's primary care provider or another provider determines that receiving the services separately would subject the enrollee to unnecessary risk.(4) For an enrollee that uses managed long-term services and supports, the enrollee would have to change the enrollee's residential, institutional or employment supports provider based on the provider's change in status from an in-network to an out-of-network provider and would experience a disruption in the enrollee's residence or employment.(5) Other reasons, including poor quality of care, lack of access to services covered under the contract or lack of access to providers experienced in dealing with the enrollee's care needs.(d) A determination of good cause shall be supported by documentation or other information sufficient for the department to validate the basis for the request. A request may not be approved solely on the basis of a general preference for another managed care plan, dissatisfaction unsupported by facts specific to the eligible person, self-attestation without supporting 20260SB1371PN1776 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information or a general allegation regarding the managed care plan.(e) For purposes of subsection (c)(5), a request based on poor quality of care shall be supported by objective information substantiating a circumstance affecting the eligible person's health, safety, access to covered services, continuity of care or ability to receive medically necessary services. The department shall consider substantiated complaints, grievance or appeal determinations, critical incident reports, missed service records, service plan or authorization records, provider documentation, care management records, external quality review findings, corrective action plans, sanctions, quality measure performance, Consumer Assessment of Healthcare Providers and Systems results, Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set measures, National Committee for Quality Assurance accreditation or ratings, Medicaid and CHIP Quality Rating System measures or other reliable information identified by the department. A request based on poor quality of care may not be approved solely on the basis of an unsupported assertion, general dissatisfaction or preference for another managed care plan.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a general or categorical waiver of subsection (a) permitting eligible persons to change managed care plans at any time without cause unless required by Federal law or approved by statute.(g) The department shall establish procedures for notice, review and appeal of a denial of a plan-change request under this section.(h) The secretary shall seek any amendment, modification, 20260SB1371PN1776 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewal or approval of a waiver authorized under section 1915(b) of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(b)) or other Federal authority necessary to implement this section, including any amendment, modification, renewal or approval necessary to establish an enrollment limitation, annual plan selection period and good cause transfer process consistent with 42 CFR 438.56 (relating to disenrollment: requirements and limitations). The department shall implement this section to the fullest extent permitted under Federal law and shall condition implementation of any provision requiring Federal approval upon receipt of the necessary approval.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1371PN1776 - 4 - 123456789101112